Colorado, session 2026A, HB1028.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The purpose of updating Colorado's seal of biliteracy is to
modernize, clarify, and expand equitable access to Colorado's seal of
biliteracy for high school graduates while maintaining rigorous standards;
(b) Colorado's seal of biliteracy was established to recognize high
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

school graduates who demonstrate proficiency in English and at least one
additional world language. The seal signals readiness for college, careers,
and participation in a global economy.
(c) The implementation of the seal of biliteracy has varied widely
across school districts: Out of the 179 school districts in Colorado, only 55
of them offer the seal of biliteracy for high school diplomas. Many students,
particularly those in rural districts, small schools, or districts without formal
biliteracy programs, face barriers when accessing the seal of biliteracy,
despite demonstrating strong language skills.
(d) Biliteracy is defined as the proficiency in actively listening to,
speaking, understanding, reading, and writing in English and another world
language, while bilingualism is defined as the speaking, listening, and
understanding of another world language and English;
(e) In order to earn a seal of biliteracy, high school students should
be able to demonstrate speaking, listening, reading, and writing proficiency
in a world language in numerous ways, including in coursework,
assessments, or approved bodies of evidence;
(f) Colorado's public schools educate 114,482 multilingual learners.
Expanding access to the seal of biliteracy and creating access to a seal of
bilingualism for high school graduates will demonstrate Colorado's
commitment to supporting all students.
(g) Multilingualism is a proven asset in business, health care,
education, government services, and national security. Local and global
industries in Colorado have unique demands for language skills, creating
distinct career opportunities for multilingual professionals. The seal of
biliteracy will allow high school graduates to prove their language skills to
potential employers and will ease their transition into the workforce and
higher education.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1009.5, amend
(2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II)(B), (2)(b)(II), and (2)(b)(III); repeal (3)(b)(III); and add
(1)(a.3), (1)(a.5), (1)(b.3), (2)(a)(II)(C), (2)(a)(II)(D), (2.5), and (5) as
follows:
22-7-1009.5. Diploma endorsement - biliteracy - bilingualism -
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1028

definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a.3) "BILINGUALISM" MEANS THE ABILITY TO SPEAK, ACTIVELY
LISTEN TO, AND UNDERSTAND ENGLISH AND ANOTHER WORLD LANGUAGE.
(a.5) "BILITERACY" MEANS THE ABILITY TO ACTIVELY LISTEN TO,
SPEAK, UNDERSTAND, READ, AND WRITE ENGLISH AND ANOTHER WORLD
LANGUAGE.
(b.3) "STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MEANS A STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-18-102 (10),
AND A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE.
(2) A local education provider may grant a diploma endorsement in
biliteracy to a graduating high school student who attains proficiency or
higher in one or more world languages in addition to attaining proficiency
or higher in English. To obtain an endorsement in biliteracy, a graduating
student must:
(a) Demonstrate proficiency or higher in English by:
(I) Completing all of the English language arts course requirements
for graduation from high school with an overall grade point average of at
least 3.0 in the required English language arts courses; and OR
(II) (B) Passing the English language arts advanced placement test
with a score of three or higher or passing the English language arts portion
of an international baccalaureate test with a score of four or higher; and OR
(C) MEETING ONE OF THE OPTIONS FOR COLLEGE AND CAREER
READINESS BY USING ANY OF THE READING, WRITING, AND COMMUNICATING
METHODS AND LEVELS INDICATED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S MENU OF COLLEGE
AND CAREER READY DEMONSTRATIONS, AS ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD,
OR A SUCCESSOR FRAMEWORK AND GUIDELINES; OR
(D) MEETING REQUIREMENTS FOR REDESIGNATION AS DESCRIBED IN
THE COLORADO STANDARDIZED REDESIGNATION PROCEDURES FOR
MULTILINGUAL LEARNERS; AND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1028

(b) Demonstrate proficiency or higher in one or more world
languages by:
(II) Successfully completing a four-year high school course of study
in the world language and attaining an overall grade point average of at
least 3.0 in the course of study; PASSING A WORLD LANGUAGE COURSE OF
STUDY THAT IS EQUIVALENT IN RIGOR TO A WORLD LANGUAGE ADVANCED
PLACEMENT COURSE WITH AN OVERALL GRADE POINT AVERAGE OF AT LEAST
3.0 IN THE COURSE OF STUDY, PASSING THE SUMMATIVE ASSESSMENT AT THE
COMPLETION OF A FOUR-YEAR HIGH SCHOOL COURSE OF STUDY IN THE
WORLD LANGUAGE, OR PROVIDING A BODY OF EVIDENCE THAT MEASURES
SPEAKING, ACTIVELY LISTENING TO, UNDERSTANDING, READING, AND
WRITING THE LANGUAGE. IF PROVIDING A BODY OF EVIDENCE, THE EVIDENCE
MUST BE OF EQUAL RIGOR TO THE ADVANCED PLACEMENT TEST; or
(III) Achieving a passing score on the world language portion of a
nationally recognized test that ASSESSES THE STUDENT'S ABILITY TO SPEAK,
ACTIVELY LISTEN TO, UNDERSTAND, READ, AND WRITE AND is relied upon by
institutions of higher education.
(2.5) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY GRANT A DIPLOMA
ENDORSEMENT IN BILINGUALISM TO A GRADUATING HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT
WHO ATTAINS PROFICIENCY OR HIGHER IN ONE OR MORE WORLD LANGUAGES
IN ADDITION TO ATTAINING PROFICIENCY OR HIGHER IN ENGLISH. TO OBTAIN
AN ENDORSEMENT IN BILINGUALISM, A GRADUATING STUDENT MUST:
(a) DEMONSTRATE ORAL PROFICIENCY OR HIGHER IN ENGLISH BY:
(I) MEETING ONE OF THE OPTIONS FOR COLLEGE AND CAREER
READINESS BY USING ANY OF THE READING, WRITING, AND COMMUNICATING
METHODS AND LEVELS INDICATED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S MENU OF COLLEGE
AND CAREER READY DEMONSTRATIONS, AS ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD,
OR A SUCCESSOR FRAMEWORK AND GUIDELINES; OR
(II) MEETING REQUIREMENTS FOR REDESIGNATION AS DESCRIBED IN
THE COLORADO STANDARDIZED REDESIGNATION PROCEDURES FOR
MULTILINGUAL LEARNERS; AND
(b) DEMONSTRATE ORAL PROFICIENCY OR HIGHER IN ONE OR MORE
WORLD LANGUAGES BY ACHIEVING A PASSING SCORE ON THE WORLD
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1028

LANGUAGE ORAL PORTION OF A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TEST THAT
ASSESSES THE STUDENT'S ABILITY TO LISTEN, SPEAK, AND UNDERSTAND AND
IS RELIED UPON BY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION; OR
(c) PROVIDE A BODY OF EVIDENCE THAT MEASURES SPEAKING,
ACTIVELY LISTENING TO, AND UNDERSTANDING THE LANGUAGE. IF
PROVIDING A BODY OF EVIDENCE, THE EVIDENCE MUST BE OF EQUAL RIGOR
TO THE ADVANCED PLACEMENT TEST.
(3) (b) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (2)(b)(I) of this
section to the contrary:
(III) If an advanced placement test exists or the department has
identified a comparable test for a world language, and the local education
provider creates and uses an alternative test for that world language, the
department must approve the local education provider's test before the local
education provider may use the test to determine a student's level of
proficiency in the world language in place of an advanced placement test
for purposes of subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section.
(5) (a) A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT WHO ATTENDS A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER THAT DOES NOT OFFER A DIPLOMA ENDORSEMENT OF BILITERACY,
OR BILINGUALISM, PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (2) AND (2.5) OF THIS
SECTION MAY SEEK AN ENDORSEMENT OF BILITERACY OR BILINGUALISM
FROM A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR OTHER LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER THAT OFFERS THE ENDORSEMENT THE STUDENT IS
SEEKING.
(b) PRIOR TO SEEKING A DIPLOMA ENDORSEMENT OF BILITERACY OR
BILINGUALISM FROM A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR OTHER
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER, A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT MUST FIRST SEEK
THE ENDORSEMENT FROM THEIR OWN LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER. IF THE
STUDENT'S LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER DOES NOT OFFER THE
ENDORSEMENT AND CHOOSES NOT TO ESTABLISH A PROGRAM TO OFFER THE
ENDORSEMENT, THE STUDENT'S LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY ENTER
INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH ANOTHER LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER OR STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT OFFERS A DIPLOMA ENDORSEMENT
OF BILITERACY OR BILINGUALISM, WHICHEVER ENDORSEMENT THE STUDENT
IS SEEKING.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1028

(c) AFTER A STUDENT SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES THE
ENDORSEMENT, THE STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR OTHER
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL SEND VERIFICATION OF THE COMPLETED
ENDORSEMENT TO THE STUDENT AND THE STUDENT'S LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER.
(d) A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR OTHER LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY CHARGE A FEE TO PROVIDE THE ENDORSEMENT.
THE FEE MUST REFLECT THE ACTUAL AND INDIRECT COSTS TO THE STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR OTHER LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER
OF PROVIDING THE BILITERACY ENDORSEMENT PROGRAM. ANY FEE ASSESSED
MUST BE PAID BY THE STUDENT'S LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1028

and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1028